California, session 20252026, SB453.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8371.6 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:8371.6. (a) (1) The commission shall require each electrical corporation to provide to the commission, on or before January 15, 2026, the status of any awarded or unallocated funds collected for purposes of the Microgrid Incentive Program established pursuant to commission Decision 21-01-018 (January 21, 2021), Decision Adopting Rates, Tariffs, and Rules Facilitating the Commercialization of Microgrids Pursuant to Senate Bill 1339 and Resiliency Strategies, and Decision 23-04-034 (April 14, 2023), Decision Adopting Implementation Rules for the Microgrid Incentive Program.(2) The commission shall review the status of the unallocated funds of each electrical corporation provided pursuant to paragraph (1) and determine whether additional actions actions, using the funds collected on or before January 1, 2026, are needed to advance the Microgrid Incentive Program.(3) If the commission determines, after conducting a the review required pursuant to paragraph (2), that additional actions are needed to advance the Microgrid Incentive Program for the electrical corporation, the commission shall do both of the following:(A) Consider the use of a third-party administrator to administer the Microgrid Incentive Program for the electrical corporation.(B) (i) In addition to the requirements of the Microgrid Incentive Program, ensure the remaining unallocated funds are allocated to areas that have experienced two or more deenergization events, prioritizing vulnerable communities, including access and functional needs populations who rely on electric medical devices and refrigerated medication, and prioritizing customers that operate critical community infrastructure that support resiliency during a deenergization event.(ii) If there are remaining unallocated funds on January 1, 2027, those funds shall be returned to ratepayers as bill credits.(b) This section does not authorize the commission to impose an additional charge on ratepayers or to otherwise require the collection of additional funds from ratepayers.(b)(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Access and functional needs population” has the same meaning as defined in Section 8593.3 of the Government Code.(2) “Critical community infrastructure” has the same meaning as defined in Section 90100 of the Public Resources Code.(3) “Deenergization event” has the same meaning as defined in Section 8385.(4) “Vulnerable communities” has the same meaning as defined in Section 71340 of the Public Resources Code.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.